Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

33-9-101. Commission - creation - composition - terms - vacancies - removal - meetings - strategic plan - legislative declaration.

Effective July 1, 2012, there is hereby created the parks and wildlife commission, also referred to in this article as the "commission".

Repealed.

The commission consists of thirteen members, as follows:

Two members who are ex officio nonvoting members, as follows:

The executive director; and

The commissioner of the department of agriculture;

Eleven voting members who are appointed, in accordance with subsection (3) of this section, by the governor with the consent of the senate.

The eleven voting members of the commission are as follows:

Three members who are sports persons who can demonstrate a reasonable knowledge of wildlife issues and who have obtained a hunting or fishing license issued under this title 33 for at least each of the three years prior to their appointments. One of the members appointed pursuant to this subsection (3)(a)(I) must be an outfitter registered pursuant to article 145 of title 12.

Three members who are actively involved in production agriculture as owners or lessees of the agricultural property and owners or partial owners of the commodities produced on the land and who can demonstrate a reasonable knowledge of wildlife issues;

Three members who can demonstrate that they regularly engage in outdoor recreation and utilize parks resources. One member appointed under this subparagraph (III) shall represent a nonprofit organization that supports and promotes the conservation and enhancement of Colorado's wildlife and habitat; recognizes and promotes primarily nonconsumptive wildlife use; and has expertise in wildlife issues, wildlife habitat, or wildlife management; and

Two members appointed from the public at-large.

In appointing members to the commission under paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the governor shall make appointments that ensure that a reasonable balance of the following areas of knowledge and experience, as they relate to parks and wildlife, are represented: Outdoor business, service as a current or former local elected official, youth outdoor education, wildlife biology or science, energy, conservation, beneficial uses of water, land conservation and conservation easements, and diversified trails interests and activities. In order to satisfy the requirements of this paragraph (b), the governor shall give preference to persons with experience or expertise in multiple areas of knowledge.

Regardless of the particular interests or qualifications possessed by each member appointed to the commission pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), each commissioner represents diverse parks, wildlife, and outdoor recreation throughout Colorado and is committed to the long-term financial stability and sustainability of the department.

Of the voting members appointed to the commission, there shall not be a difference of more than one person between those members affiliated with any major political party.

To the extent possible, voting members shall be appointed to the commission in a manner that ensures balanced geographical representation of diverse areas of the state. At least four voting members shall be appointed from west of the continental divide.

Terms of members serving pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section are for four years.

No member serving pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section is permitted to serve more than two consecutive terms.

Repealed.

The governor shall fill vacancies on the commission for any unexpired term, with the consent of the senate. The member appointed to fill a vacancy shall be from the same category described in paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section as the member vacating the position.

The governor is permitted to remove members of the commission only for cause.

Six voting commissioners constitute a quorum for purposes of conducting the business of the commission.

For purposes of mailing and service, the commission's principal office is in the office of the executive director.

For each day actually engaged in the duties of the commission, the commission members are entitled to receive a per diem amount of fifty dollars, together with all actual and necessary travel expenses to be paid after the expenses are incurred. Mileage rates are as provided in section 24-9-104, C.R.S.

The commission is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercises its powers and performs its duties and functions under the department and the executive director of the department.

The initial meeting of the commission shall be convened by the executive director.
(10) (a) (I) The initial meeting of the commission shall be convened by the executive director.

At the first meeting, the commission shall:

Elect a chair and vice-chair from the members serving pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section, who shall serve in that capacity for a term of one year but who may be reelected for additional terms; and

Designate two members to serve as representatives to the state board of the great outdoors Colorado trust fund established under article XXVII of the state constitution. One representative must be a commissioner with wildlife knowledge appointed pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section, and the other representative must be a commissioner with experience in outdoor recreation appointed pursuant to subparagraph (III) of paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section.

The commission shall meet as often as necessary and may adopt policies and procedures necessary to carry out its duties. The commission shall conduct at least two meetings per calendar year at locations west of the continental divide.

In addition to discharging its regular duties and functions, the commission shall specifically discuss and formulate a five-year strategic plan to address ongoing or new issues resulting after, and identify increased efficiencies and cost savings that may be realized from, the 2011 merger of the former division of wildlife and the former division of parks and outdoor recreation into the division of parks and wildlife. The strategic plan must address how the merger has affected policies, objectives, strategies, and estimated annual fiscal costs and savings associated with the duties and programs of the division.

The commission shall finalize the strategic plan required by this subsection (11) by December 31, 2013. In developing the strategic plan, the commission shall place special emphasis on obtaining meaningful statewide input.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11), C.R.S., for every year included in the strategic plan, the commission shall submit a report annually to the house committee on agriculture, livestock, and natural resources and the senate committee on agriculture, natural resources, and energy, or any successor committees, regarding the progress and status of the strategic plan. In order to reduce costs associated with preparing and transmitting such reports, the commission is authorized to send the reports in an electronic format.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that it is the policy of the state that:

Colorado's wildlife, natural, scenic, and scientific resources must be protected, preserved, enhanced, and managed for the use, benefit, and enjoyment of the people of the state and its visitors;

Colorado's agriculture plays a vital role in providing the state's wildlife, natural, scenic, and scientific resources the habitat and conditions that allow these resources to thrive;

A comprehensive program designed to offer the greatest possible variety of recreational opportunity to the people of the state and its visitors is provided;

There must be a continuous operation of planning, acquisition, development, and management of wildlife habitats, state parks, outdoor recreation lands, trails, waters, and facilities in a manner that recognizes the private property rights of individual property owners; and

Both education and outreach activities must be used to promote natural resources stewardship.

The general assembly further finds and declares that the mission of the commission and the division is to perpetuate the wildlife resources of the state, to provide a quality state parks system, and to provide enjoyable and sustainable outdoor recreation opportunities that educate and inspire current and future generations to serve as active stewards of Colorado's natural resources.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-208), ch. 293, p. 1371, § 2, effective July 1 (see editor's note).

L. 2012:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1198, § 1, effective June 4.

L. 2019:

(3)(a)(I) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1720, § 221, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(3)(e)(I) amended and (3)(f) repealed, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 300, § 59, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(9) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3408, § 159, effective August 10.

33-9-102. Powers and duties of commission - rules.

The commission is vested with all the powers, responsibilities, obligations, functions, and duties that previously were under the jurisdiction of the former wildlife commission or the former board of parks and outdoor recreation as of June 30, 2011.

In addition to any other specific grant of rule-making authority, the commission may adopt or revise any rules, in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., that the commission deems necessary or convenient to effect the purposes of, and fulfill its duties under, this title.

The commission shall designate a commission member with wildlife knowledge appointed pursuant to section 33-9-101 (3)(a)(I) to serve as a representative to the state board of the great outdoors Colorado trust fund established under article XXVII of the state constitution. The commission shall designate a commission member with parks and outdoor recreation knowledge appointed pursuant to section 33-9-101 (3)(a)(III) to serve as a representative to the state board of the great outdoors Colorado trust fund established under article XXVII of the state constitution.

In promulgating a rule to increase or decrease a park fee or charge under articles 10 to 15 and 32 of this title 33, the commission shall consider the effect that the change in the fee or charge would have on park usage, the demand for the service for which the fee or charge is used, and opportunities to implement differential pricing.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2018.)

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-208), ch. 293, p. 1376, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1210, § 23, effective June 4.

L. 2018:

(4) amended, (SB 18-143), ch. 207, p. 1335, § 11, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3475, § 45, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(4)(c) repealed, (SB 21-249), ch. 273, p. 1589, § 4, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Hunting, Fishing, and Parks for Future Generations Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 18-143, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 207, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

33-9-103. Office of director of division created - duties.

The office of director of the division is hereby created. The commission, with the consent of the executive director, shall appoint the director. The director shall devote his or her entire time to the service of the state in the discharge of his or her official duties and shall not hold any other public office. The appointment or removal of the director is subject to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution. The director shall possess such qualifications as may be established by the commission, the executive director, and the state personnel director.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2012.)

The director shall execute, administer, perform, and enforce the rights, powers, duties, functions, and obligations vested previously in the director of the division of wildlife and the director of the division of parks and outdoor recreation, including those duties described under sections 33-1-110 and 33-10-109.

The director shall exercise all the powers and perform all the functions of the commission in the interim between its meetings, subject to the ratification of the commission. The director shall act as recording secretary for the commission and is the custodian of all minutes and other records of the commission. The director shall perform such duties as prescribed by the commission, by the executive director, or by law; except that the director has no authority to promulgate rules.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-208), ch. 293, p. 1376, § 2, effective July 1 (see editor's note).

L. 2012:

(1) and (3) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1210, § 24, effective June 4.

Editor's note:

Section 29 of chapter 293, Session Laws of Colorado 2011, provides that the act adding this section takes effect on June 6, 2011.

33-9-104. Division of parks and wildlife - creation - duties.

There is hereby created a division of parks and wildlife in the department of natural resources, also referred to in this article as the "division". The division is under the jurisdiction of the commission.

The division is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercises its powers and performs its duties and functions specified in this title 33 under the department of natural resources and the executive director thereof. The division has all the powers, duties, obligations, and functions previously exercised by the division of wildlife or the division of parks and outdoor recreation, as those divisions existed on June 30, 2011.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-208), ch. 293, p. 1377, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1211, § 25, effective June 4.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3408, § 160, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

33-9-105. Enterprise status of commission and division.

The division and the commission constitute an enterprise for the purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, so long as the commission retains the authority to issue revenue bonds and the division receives less than ten percent of its total annual revenues in grants, as defined in section 24-77-102 (7), C.R.S., from all Colorado state and local governments combined. So long as they constitute an enterprise pursuant to this section, the division and the commission are not subject to any of the provisions of section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

The enterprise created pursuant to this section has all the powers and duties of the commission and the division as authorized under this title.

Nothing in this section limits or restricts the authority of the division to expend its revenues consistent with this title.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-208), ch. 293, p. 1377, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1211, § 26, effective June 4.

33-9-106. Reports.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2012.)

Beginning in 2013 and notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11), C.R.S., the executive director shall report annually to the joint house agriculture, livestock, and natural resources committee and the senate agriculture, natural resources, and energy committee, or any successor committees, regarding the administration of the division, including an evaluation of division resources and their utilization and an identification of opportunities for efficiencies. Each such report must summarize stakeholder outreach conducted during the prior year and must also identify disposition of assets and cost savings, both planned and realized, since the previous year, including savings pertaining to personnel, equipment, services, and provisioning.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-208), ch. 293, p. 1378, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1211, § 27, effective June 4.

33-9-107. Reaffirmation of assent to federal Pittman-Robertson and Dingell-Johnson acts.

Nothing in this article alters or affects the state's assent to the federal acts described in sections 33-1-117 and 33-1-118, which assent prohibits diversion of license fees paid by hunters and sport fishermen to purposes other than administration of the fish and wildlife agency.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-208), ch. 293, p. 1378, § 2, effective July 1.

33-9-108. Transfer of functions - employees - property - records - rules - contracts - lawsuits - statutory references.

The commission shall execute, administer, perform, and enforce the rights, powers, duties, functions, and obligations vested previously in the former wildlife commission or the former board of parks and outdoor recreation.

The division shall execute, administer, perform, and enforce the rights, powers, duties, functions, and obligations vested previously in the division of wildlife or the division of parks and outdoor recreation.

The director shall execute, administer, perform, and enforce the rights, powers, duties, functions, and obligations vested previously in the director of the division of wildlife or the director of the division of parks and outdoor recreation.

All positions of employment in the wildlife commission and the board of parks and outdoor recreation concerning the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the parks and wildlife commission pursuant to this article and determined to be necessary to carry out the purposes of this title by the parks and wildlife commission are transferred to the commission and are employment positions therein. All such employees are employees of the commission for purposes of section 24-50-124, C.R.S., and retain all rights under the state personnel system and to retirement benefits pursuant to the laws of this state, and their services shall be deemed continuous.

All positions of employment in the division of wildlife and the division of parks and outdoor recreation concerning the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the division of parks and wildlife pursuant to this article and determined to be necessary to carry out the purposes of this title by the director are transferred to the division and are employment positions therein. All such employees are employees of the division for purposes of section 24-50-124, C.R.S., and retain all rights under the state personnel system and to retirement benefits pursuant to the laws of this state, and their services shall be deemed continuous.

All items of property, real and personal, including office furniture and fixtures, books, documents, and records of the wildlife commission or the board of parks and outdoor recreation are transferred to the parks and wildlife commission and become the property thereof.

All items of property, real and personal, including office furniture and fixtures, books, documents, and records of the division of wildlife or the division of parks and outdoor recreation are transferred to the division of parks and wildlife and become the property thereof.

All personal and real property acquired in whole or in part with license fees or federal grant funds is subject to accountability and control by the division to assure that the property serves the purpose for which it was originally acquired throughout its useful life.

Whenever the wildlife commission or the board of parks and outdoor recreation is referred to or designated by any contract or other document, the reference or designation applies to the parks and wildlife commission. All contracts entered into by the wildlife commission or the board of parks and outdoor recreation prior to June 30, 2011, are hereby validated, with the commission succeeding to all rights and obligations under such contracts. Any cash funds, custodial funds, trusts, grants, and any appropriations of funds from prior fiscal years available to satisfy obligations incurred under such contracts shall be transferred and appropriated to the commission for the payment of such obligations.

Whenever the division of wildlife or the division of parks and outdoor recreation is referred to or designated by any contract or other document, the reference or designation applies to the division of parks and wildlife. All contracts entered into by the former divisions prior to June 30, 2011, are hereby validated, with the division succeeding to all rights and obligations under such contracts. Any cash funds, custodial funds, trusts, grants, and any appropriations of funds from prior fiscal years available to satisfy obligations incurred under such contracts are transferred and appropriated to the division for the payment of such obligations.

Unless otherwise specified:

Whenever any law refers to the wildlife commission, the board of parks and outdoor recreation, or the parks and wildlife board, that law shall be construed as referring to the parks and wildlife commission; and

Whenever any law refers to the division of wildlife or the division of parks and outdoor recreation, that law shall be construed as referring to the division of parks and wildlife.

The revisor of statutes is hereby authorized to change all references in the Colorado Revised Statutes to the wildlife commission, the board of parks and outdoor recreation, or the parks and wildlife board from such references to the parks and wildlife commission, as appropriate. The revisor of statutes is also authorized to change all references in the Colorado Revised Statutes to the division of wildlife or the division of parks and outdoor recreation from such references to the division of parks and wildlife, as appropriate. In connection with this authority, the revisor of statutes is hereby authorized to amend or delete provisions of the Colorado Revised Statutes so as to make the statutes consistent with the powers, duties, and functions transferred pursuant to this article.

All rules and orders of the wildlife commission or the board of parks and outdoor recreation continue to be effective and shall be enforced by the commission until superseded, revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law. The commission shall adopt any rules necessary for the administration of the division and as otherwise authorized by this title.

All commissioned peace officers of the division of parks and wildlife have all the powers, duties, functions, special protections, and responsibilities that such officers exercised or enjoyed under the division of wildlife or the division of parks and outdoor recreation.

No suit, action, or other proceeding, judicial or administrative, lawfully commenced, or which could have been commenced, by or against the wildlife commission, the board of parks and outdoor recreation, the parks and wildlife board, the division of wildlife, or the division of parks and outdoor recreation, or any officer thereof in such officer's official capacity or in relation to the discharge of the official's duties, is abated by reason of the transfer of duties and functions to the parks and wildlife commission or the division under this article.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-208), ch. 293, p. 1378, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1)(a), (2)(a), (3)(a), (4)(a), (5), (6), and (8) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1212, § 28, effective June 4.

33-9-109. Funds - appropriations to former divisions in 2011 general appropriations act.

Nothing in this article alters or affects funds previously administered by the former wildlife commission or the former board of parks and outdoor recreation; except that the parks and wildlife commission shall administer such funds.

The commission shall adopt policies, procedures, or accounting methods to ensure transparency and prevent the unauthorized commingling or impermissible use of moneys in distinct funds, to ensure that moneys are expended consistent with the purposes for which they are received, collected, or appropriated, and to ensure that appropriate records are maintained for audit purposes.

The commission shall segregate all moneys received pursuant to section 3 (1)(b)(II) of article XXVII of the state constitution from all other moneys and shall spend these moneys solely for development and improvement of new and existing state parks, recreation areas, and recreational trails.

The commission shall segregate all moneys received pursuant to section 5 (1)(a)(I) of article XXVII of the state constitution and spend these moneys solely for investments in the wildlife resources of Colorado, including the protection and restoration of crucial wildlife habitats, appropriate programs for maintaining Colorado's diverse wildlife heritage, wildlife watching, and educational programs about wildlife and wildlife environment, consistent with the purposes set forth under section 1 (1)(a) of article XXVII.

The commission shall segregate all moneys received pursuant to section 5 (1)(a)(II) of article XXVII of the state constitution and spend these moneys solely for investments in the outdoor recreation resources of Colorado, including the state parks system, trails, public information and environmental education resources, and water for recreational facilities, consistent with the purposes set forth under section 1 (1)(a) of article XXVII.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-208), ch. 293, p. 1381, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1213, § 29, effective June 4.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (4), effective July 1, 2013. (See L. 2011, p. 1381.)

33-9-110. Black bears - methods to address bear-human conflicts - study - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1304), ch. 169, p. 517, § 1, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2016. (See L. 2015, p. 517.)

33-9-111. Disclosure of knowing misrepresentation by a peace officer required - disclosure waivers - reports - definitions.

Subject to the limitations of this section, if the division employs, employed, or deputized on or after January 1, 2010, a peace officer who applies for employment with another Colorado law enforcement agency, the division shall disclose to the hiring agency information, if available, indicating whether the peace officer's employment history included any instances in which the peace officer had a sustained violation for making a knowing misrepresentation:

In any testimony or affidavit relating to the arrest or prosecution of a person or to a civil case pertaining to the peace officer or to the peace officer's employment history; or

During the course of any internal investigation by a law enforcement agency, which investigation is related to the peace officer's alleged criminal conduct; official misconduct, as described in section 18-8-404 or 18-8-405, C.R.S.; or use of excessive force, regardless of whether the alleged criminal conduct, official misconduct, or use of excessive force occurred while the peace officer was on duty, off duty, or acting pursuant to a service contract to which the division is a party.

The disclosure described in subsection (1) of this section is required only upon the presentation of a written waiver to the division, which waiver explicitly authorizes the division to disclose the information described in said subsection (1), has been signed by the applicant peace officer, and identifies the Colorado law enforcement agency that is considering the applicant peace officer for employment. If the division receives such a waiver, the division shall provide the disclosure to the Colorado law enforcement agency that is considering the applicant peace officer for employment not more than seven days after such receipt.

The division is not required to provide the disclosure described in subsection (1) of this section if the division is prohibited from providing such disclosure pursuant to a binding nondisclosure agreement to which the division is a party, which agreement was executed before August 5, 2015.

The division shall notify the local district attorney whenever the division determines there is a sustained finding that any peace officer of the division has made a knowing misrepresentation:

In any testimony or affidavit relating to the arrest or prosecution of a person or to a civil case pertaining to the peace officer or to the peace officer's employment history; or

During the course of any internal investigation by a law enforcement agency, which investigation is related to the peace officer's alleged criminal conduct; official misconduct, as described in section 18-8-404 or 18-8-405, C.R.S.; or use of excessive force, regardless of whether the alleged criminal conduct, official misconduct, or use of excessive force occurred while the peace officer was on duty, off duty, or acting pursuant to a service contract to which the division is a party.

The division shall provide the notice described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) not more than seven days after the division determines there is a sustained finding that a peace officer of the division has made a knowing misrepresentation, as described in said paragraph (a).

The division is not liable for complying with the provisions of this section.

As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise, "state or local law enforcement agency" means:

The Colorado state patrol created pursuant to section 24-33.5-201, C.R.S.;

The Colorado bureau of investigation created pursuant to section 24-33.5-401, C.R.S.;

A county sheriff's office;

A municipal police department;

The division of parks and wildlife within the department of natural resources created pursuant to section 24-1-124, C.R.S.; or

A town marshal's office.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (SB 15-218), ch. 209, p. 765, § 5, effective August 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 15-218, see section 1 of chapter 209, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

33-9-112. Peace officer hiring - required use of waiver - definitions.

The division shall require each candidate that it interviews for a peace officer position who has been employed by another law enforcement agency or governmental agency to execute a written waiver that explicitly authorizes each law enforcement agency or governmental agency that has employed the candidate to disclose the applicant's files, including internal affairs files, to the division and releases the division and each law enforcement agency or governmental agency that employed the candidate from any liability related to the use and disclosure of the files. A law enforcement agency or governmental agency may disclose the applicant's files by either providing copies or allowing the division to review the files at the law enforcement agency's office or governmental agency's office. A candidate who refuses to execute the waiver shall not be considered for employment by the division. The division shall, at least twenty-one days prior to making the hiring decision, submit the waiver to each law enforcement agency or governmental agency that has employed the candidate. A state or local law enforcement agency or governmental agency that receives such a waiver shall provide the disclosure to the division not more than twenty-one days after such receipt.

A state or local law enforcement agency is not required to provide the disclosures described in subsection (1) of this section if the agency is prohibited from providing the disclosure pursuant to a binding nondisclosure agreement to which the agency is a party, which agreement was executed before June 10, 2016.

A state or local law enforcement agency or governmental agency is not liable for complying with the provisions of this section or participating in an official oral interview with an investigator regarding the candidate.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Files" means all performance reviews, any other files related to job performance, administrative files, grievances, previous personnel applications, personnel-related claims, disciplinary actions, and all complaints, early warnings, and commendations, but does not include nonperformance or conduct-related data, including medical files, schedules, pay and benefit information, or similar administrative data or information.

"State or local law enforcement agency" means:

The Colorado state patrol created pursuant to section 24-33.5-201, C.R.S.;

The Colorado bureau of investigation created pursuant to section 24-33.5-401, C.R.S.;

A county sheriff's office;

A municipal police department;

The division of parks and wildlife within the department of natural resources created pursuant to section 24-1-124, C.R.S.; or

A town marshal's office.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1262), ch. 339, p. 1385, § 5, effective June 10.

33-9-113. Parks and wildlife commission duties - gifts, grants, and donations for Fishers Peak state park - funding needs reporting - repeal.

The commission shall seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of developing and improving Fishers Peak state park.

By December 1, 2020, the commission shall submit a report to the general assembly detailing state park funding needs and shortfalls.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source: L. 2020:

Entire section added, (SB 20-003), ch. 149, p. 642, § 4, effective June 29.

Cross references:

For the short title ("I Love Colorado State Parks Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 20-003, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 149, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.